Hawaii statutes.
§380-11 Contempt; speedy and public trial.
In all cases arising under this chapter in which a person is charged with
contempt in a court of the State, the accused shall enjoy the right to a speedy
and public trial by an impartial jury of the circuit wherein the contempt has
been committed; provided that this right shall not apply to contempts committed
in the presence of the court or so near thereto as to interfere directly with
the administration of justice or to apply to the misbehavior, misconduct, or
disobedience of any officer of the court in respect to the writs, orders, or
process of the court. [L 1963, c 200, §11; Supp, §90B-11; HRS §380-11]

Case Notes

Union not entitled to jury trial in contempt proceedings
brought for violating injunction issued at HPERB's behest. 66 H. 461, 667 P.2d
783 (1983).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next